Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Service Programs for Older Alaskans.

Sec. 47.65.010.
Appropriations for service programs.

An amount to carry out the provisions of AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

may be appropriated annually by the legislature. The amount appropriated shall be fully distributed by the department to sponsors of older Alaskans service programs in accordance with the provisions of AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1990; am § 15 ch 131 SLA 1994; am § 9 ch 42 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For older Alaskans pilot project grants, see 7 AAC 79.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “department” for “Alaska Commission on Aging” in the second sentence.

Sec. 47.65.020.
Grants for community service programs.

Not less than 60 percent of the amount appropriated by the legislature for older Alaskans service programs under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

shall be allocated annually by the department as community program grants to sponsors of older Alaskans service programs. Payments shall be made on the basis of applications submitted to the department by sponsors of community programs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 10 ch 42 SLA 1997; am § 9 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “department” for “commission” in each sentence.

Sec. 47.65.030.
Pilot project grants.

The balance of the amount appropriated for older Alaskans service programs under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

not allocated under AS

47.65.020

shall be allocated annually by the department as grants to support pilot projects for the benefit of older Alaskans under this section.

The department shall adopt standards for pilot project grants and, after adoption of the standards as regulations, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), shall apply the standards to determine eligibility of applicants for pilot project grants. In awarding pilot project grants, the department shall

enter into agreements with the project sponsor to operate one or more of the selected pilot projects consistent with the standards adopted;

monitor and evaluate, in a written report, each pilot project; the report must include

a description of the project and of the persons served by it;

the problems presented by the persons served by the project;

a description of the problems most effectively handled by the project; and

an estimate of projected cost of operation of the project for the next three succeeding years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 42 SLA 1997; am § 10 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For older Alaskans pilot project grants, see 7 AAC 79.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “department” for “commission” once in subsection (a) and twice in subsection (b).

Sec. 47.65.040.
Required contribution by sponsor.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, a sponsor receiving a grant under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

shall contribute to the total cost of the program or project. The contribution may be in cash or in-kind services. The amount of the sponsor’s required contribution is determined by the application of the following formula: average per capita full and true value of all property in the municipality or community in which the project or program takes place divided by the average per capita full and true value of all property in the state, and then multiplied by the contribution percentage to the estimated total program or project cost as determined by the department at the time of approval of a grant application. However, the amount of the sponsor’s contribution may not amount to more than 10 percent of the total program or project cost.

For purposes of this section,

the contribution percentage for

a program or project in a municipality or community having a population of 5,000 or less is 10 percent of the total program or project cost;

a program or project in a municipality or community having a population of 5,001 to 10,000 is 20 percent of the total program or project cost; and

a program or project in a municipality or community having a population of more than 10,000 is 30 percent of the total program or project cost.

If an application is submitted for a program or project in a municipality or community for which no average per capita full and true property value determination has been made,

if the population of the municipality or community is 750 or more, the department shall request the state assessor to compute the average per capita full and true property value of that municipality or community and report it;

if the population is less than 750, the department may substitute for the average per capita full and true value of property in the municipality or community an amount equal to the average per capita full and true value of property in the smallest municipality for which that amount has been determined by the state assessor.

The required contribution rate of the sponsor may not exceed the contribution percentage established in (b) of this section;

The grant awarded by the department may not exceed the estimated total program or project cost as determined by the department less the contribution by the sponsor determined in accordance with this section.

When awarding a grant to support a pilot project under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

, the department may waive all or part of the sponsor contribution required under this section if waiver is in the public interest. The department shall adopt regulations establishing standards for granting waivers under this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1990; am §§ 16, 17 ch 131 SLA 1994; am §§ 11 — 14 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1984, subsection designations were added to this section.

Administrative Code. —

For older Alaskans pilot project grants, see 7 AAC 79.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “department” for “commission” in the last sentence of subsection (a), in paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2), twice in subsection (e), and in each sentence of subsection (f).

Sec. 47.65.050.
Administrative requirements.

Payments received by a sponsor under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

may be used only to meet costs of services that the department has determined directly benefit older Alaskans. A payment may not be made by the department under this section unless the department determines that the sponsor

meets accepted standards of fiscal accountability for public funds;

can demonstrate, when requested, the actual cost of services that it is providing for the benefit of older Alaskans; and

agrees to make available, upon request, all fiscal information relating to service for which payments are provided under AS

47.65.010

—

47.65.050

.

The department may not make payments to a sponsor whose program includes family respite care services or home care services unless the sponsor has agreed to request criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62 for the individual who will provide the services within 10 business days after the individual is hired to provide the services and review the information within five business days after receiving it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 23 SLA 2004; am § 15 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

P.L. 105-277, division A, Sec. 101(b) (title I, Sec. 124(a)), 112 Stat. 2681-73, provided that: “A nursing facility or home health care agency may submit a request to the Attorney General to conduct a search and exchange of [criminal history records corresponding to the fingerprints or other identification information submitted] regarding an applicant for employment if the employment position is involved in direct patient care.”

Administrative Code. —

For older Alaskans pilot project grants, see 7 AAC 79.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective April 24, 2004, in subsection (b), substituted “criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62” for “records under AS 12.62.035(a)” and made related changes.

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “department” for “commission” three times in the opening language of subsection (a) and once in subsection (b), and made a stylistic change.